Utah statutes.
7-9-34.   Tax exemption of credit unions.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, credit unions organized
under this chapter or prior law are exempt from taxation.
(2)  Any real property or any tangible personal property owned by the credit
union shall be subject to taxation to the same extent as other similar
property is taxed.
(3)  For purposes of the corporate tax, credit unions shall be governed by
Section 59-7-102.
(4)  This section does not exempt credit unions from sales or use taxes, or
fees owed to the department in accordance with this title and rules of the
department.
